Alabama, session 2026rs, HB14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
33 Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
34 of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
35 PROPOSED AMENDMENT
36 Part I. This amendment shall be known and may be cited
37 as the Alabama We The People Act.
38 Part II. (a)(1) The people may propose by the
39 initiative process that a general law be enacted by filing
40 with the Secretary of State a concise summary of the proposal
41 accompanied by a preliminary petition signed by no less than
42 1000 qualified Alabama voters and a filing fee of one thousand
43 dollars ($1,000). The filing fee shall be refundable, less any
44 administrative expenses incurred, if the initiative is
45 successfully adopted or enacted.
46 (2) The preliminary filing must be in the name of an
47 individual qualified elector who becomes the registered agent
48 for the proposition. The named individual registered agent is
49 the responsible party for any future filings and must file any
50 election reports and disclosures required by the election laws
51 in the same manner as a candidate seeking elected office. The
52 registered agent is subject to all other requirements and
53 liabilities as candidates for office.
54 (3) The Secretary of State shall verify that the name
55 and address of each qualified Alabama voter signing the
56 preliminary petition are the same or substantially similar to
Page 2

preliminary petition are the same or substantially similar to
HB14 INTRODUCED
57 the name and address that appear on the registered voter list.
58 (b) The Secretary of State shall review the
59 preliminary filing subject to any restrictions and limitations
60 imposed by the Legislature by general law and any
61 administrative rules adopted by the Secretary of State
62 regarding initiatives. Upon approval, the Secretary of State
63 shall certify to the registered agent the preliminary summary
64 of the proposal for preparation of the full text and official
65 summary of the proposal.
66 (c) Upon the request of the registered agent,
67 accompanied by the certification by the Secretary of State,
68 the Alabama Law Institute shall prepare the full text of the
69 initiative proposal, along with an official summary within 90
70 days after the request, unless the registered agent agrees in
71 writing to extend the time for preparation. The registered
72 agent must file a copy of the full text and summary as
73 prepared by the Alabama Law Institute with the Secretary of
74 State for registration and publication to seek signatures for
75 the final filing and to proceed for legislative consideration.
76 (d) Upon receipt of the full text and summary of a
77 proposal filed by the registered agent, the Secretary of State
78 shall publish the full text and summary of the proposal on the
79 Secretary of State's website. The full text of each proposal
80 shall remain published on the website for a period of no less
81 than 90 days. The summary of each proposal shall remain
82 published on the website throughout the next regular session
83 of the Legislature.
84 (e) Any proposal properly filed with the Office of the
Page 3

(e) Any proposal properly filed with the Office of the
HB14 INTRODUCED
85 Secretary of State prior to the first legislative day of any
86 regular session shall be published by the Office of the
87 Secretary of State for the review and consideration by the
88 individual members of the Legislature. No later than the third
89 legislative day, the Secretary of State shall prepare and
90 disseminate to all members of the Legislature a complete list
91 of the official summaries of all timely filed proposals. Upon
92 request by any individual member of the Legislature, the
93 Secretary of State shall provide a copy of the full text of
94 the proposal to the member. A member may elect to sponsor the
95 initiative proposal before the Legislature during that regular
96 session in the same manner as any other sponsored legislation.
97 (f) If no member of the Legislature elects to sponsor
98 a proposal, or the registered agent determines that no
99 suitable action was taken by any individual in the Legislature
100 on the proposal, the registered agent may resume the
101 initiative process only after the end of the regular session
102 by proceeding to obtain signatures in a final petition format
103 provided by the Secretary of State for qualifying the full
104 text of the proposal for consideration. The final petition
105 must be signed by qualified Alabama voters in a number that
106 equals at least seven percent of the total votes cast for
107 Governor in the last preceding gubernatorial general election.
108 Each petition shall contain a minimum number of signatures of
109 qualified Alabama voters from each congressional district in
110 the state equal to one percent of the total votes cast for
111 Governor in the last preceding gubernatorial general election
112 within each district. The Secretary of State shall verify that
Page 4

within each district. The Secretary of State shall verify that
HB14 INTRODUCED
113 the name and address of each qualified Alabama voter signing
114 the final petition are the same or substantially similar to
115 the name and address that appear on the registered voter list.
116 The 1,000 signatures contained on the preliminary petition may
117 be used toward the total requirement for the final petition.
118 (g) Once the required signatures are obtained, the
119 registered agent shall submit a copy of the full text of the
120 proposal, the summary, and final petition to the Secretary of
121 State. The registered agent has two calendar years from the
122 date of registration of the full text of the proposal and
123 summary to qualify the proposal and summary for final filing
124 and consideration. The Secretary of State shall issue to the
125 registered agent a certification for filing the full text
126 proposal and summary with the Legislature. The registered
127 agent must file the full text proposal and summary with the
128 Legislature within two years and an initiative proposal may
129 only be filed in a regular session of the Legislature.
130 (h) A full text proposal and summary for the enactment
131 of a general law shall be submitted by the registered agent
132 with certifying documentation from the Secretary of State to
133 the Legislature 30 days prior to the first legislative day of
134 the regular session by filing a copy with the Legislative
135 Services Agency, Legal Division and Fiscal Division, for a
136 constitutional and fiscal analysis, respectively. The
137 Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of
138 Representatives shall prefile in the respective houses the
139 proposal for a general law and on the first day of the session
140 the proposal shall be introduced by the President Pro Tempore
Page 5

the proposal shall be introduced by the President Pro Tempore
HB14 INTRODUCED
141 of the Senate and the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of
142 Representatives. The proposal shall be presented in bill form
143 and treated in every respect the same as any other bill for a
144 general law except as otherwise provided by this amendment and
145 except that the measure shall not be sent to the Governor nor
146 require the Governor's signature. The Legislature, upon
147 considering the proposal for the enactment of a general bill
148 by the initiative, may not alter or amend the original
149 proposal; however, the Legislature may offer an alternate
150 proposal to be considered in the same manner. If the
151 Legislature does not enact the proposal by 12:01 a.m. of the
152 30th legislative day, the proposal shall be placed on the
153 ballot by the Secretary of State. If the Legislature approves
154 an alternate proposal, both the original proposal from the
155 initiative process and the alternate legislative proposal
156 shall be placed on the ballot. The question shall be submitted
157 to the qualified voters at the first statewide election held
158 90 days or more after the Legislature adjourns. No special
159 election may be called solely for the purpose of a voter
160 initiative. "Enact" as used in this subsection means the
161 proposal is considered for a third reading before each body
162 and is voted upon by each house of the Legislature, in its
163 original form as proposed, by the end of the 29th legislative
164 day. The proposal may be a bill for a new statute, a bill to
165 amend an existing statute, or a bill to repeal an existing
166 statute in whole or in part. Upon enactment in the
167 Legislature, the Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the
168 House of Representatives, respectively, shall deliver any
Page 6

House of Representatives, respectively, shall deliver any
HB14 INTRODUCED
169 enactment by the initiative proposal to the Secretary of
170 State. The time for delivery from the Legislature to the
171 Secretary of State shall be the same as for the Governor
172 pursuant to Section 125 of the Constitution of Alabama of
173 2022, and shall not be subject to veto of any nature. The
174 initiative proposal for a general law enacted by the
175 Legislature shall become law effective upon delivery to the
176 Secretary of State, or upon the terms of the initiative. If
177 two or more proposals, including an initiative proposal and a
178 legislative alternative for a general law, proposed separately
179 for the initiative procedure or as an initiative and an
180 alternate legislative proposal, relating to essentially the
181 same subject, appear on the ballot and are adopted, the
182 measure that receives the highest number of affirmative votes
183 shall prevail to the extent of any conflict.
184 (i) No measure proposed as a statutory initiative
185 shall be sent to the Governor, but shall be sent directly to
186 the Legislative Services Agency, Legal Division, for
187 preparation of a review and comment, including an official
188 summary of the proposal for use on the ballot. Both the ballot
189 title and the official summary for the ballot shall be
190 impartial and not likely to create prejudice for or against
191 the measure and shall be prepared in consultation with the
192 initiative committee and proponents. The initiative shall be
193 sent to the Secretary of State for inclusion in the
194 appropriate election.
195 (j) No law adopted by the initiative under this
196 amendment shall be repealed or amended except by vote of the
Page 7

amendment shall be repealed or amended except by vote of the
HB14 INTRODUCED
197 people, unless it is otherwise provided by its terms.
198 Part III. (a) The people may propose a constitutional
199 amendment with statewide application by filing a preliminary
200 petition containing a summary of the proposal with the
201 Secretary of State and proceeding further in the same manner
202 and with the same requirements and following the same
203 procedures as for the petition process and the proposal of a
204 general law outlined in Part II, including the refund of the
205 filing fee, less any administrative expenses incurred, for an
206 initiative that is successfully adopted; provided, however,
207 the petition must be signed by qualified Alabama voters and
208 verified as outlined in Part II. The total number of
209 signatures on the final petition required for a proposed
210 constitutional amendment must equal at least 10 percent of the
211 total votes cast for Governor in the last preceding
212 gubernatorial general election. Each final petition shall
213 contain a minimum number of signatures of qualified Alabama
214 voters from each congressional district in the state equal to
215 1.3 percent of the total votes cast for Governor in the last
216 preceding gubernatorial general election within each district.
217 The Legislature may approve an alternative amendment which
218 shall appear on the ballot at the same time following the same
219 procedure as for a general law in Part II.
220 (b) The proposal and any alternative shall be
221 submitted to the qualified voters at the first statewide
222 election held 90 days or more after the measure qualifies;
223 however, a special election may not be called solely for the
224 purpose of a voter initiative proposal.
Page 8

purpose of a voter initiative proposal.
HB14 INTRODUCED
225 (c) No measure proposed pursuant to this part of this
226 amendment shall be sent to the Governor, but shall be sent
227 directly to the Legislative Services Agency, Legal Division,
228 for preparation of a review and comment, including an official
229 summary of the proposal for use on the ballot. Both the ballot
230 title and the official summary shall be impartial and not
231 likely to create prejudice for or against the measure and
232 shall be prepared in consideration with the initiative
233 committee and proponents. The initiative shall be sent to the
234 Secretary of State for inclusion in the appropriate election.
235 (d) A proposed amendment or the legislative
236 alternative shall become part of this constitution if approved
237 by a majority of electors voting on the proposal.
238 (e) If two constitutional amendments proposed
239 separately by the initiative procedure relating to essentially
240 the same subject appear on the ballot and are adopted, the
241 amendment which receives the highest number of affirmative
242 votes shall prevail to the extent of any conflict and shall be
243 proclaimed upon the date of ratification.
244 (f) No more than two pieces of legislation proposed
245 pursuant to this amendment may be enacted by the Legislature
246 pursuant to this amendment in any legislative session. If more
247 than two pieces of legislation are proposed, the two pieces of
248 legislation which may be enacted or placed on the ballot shall
249 be the two proposals having the greatest number of signatures.
250 If a proposal by initiative, whether a general bill or an
251 amendment to the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, has an
252 alternative proposal made by the Legislature, the ballot
Page 9

alternative proposal made by the Legislature, the ballot
HB14 INTRODUCED
253 language shall be as follows:
254 Do you favor amending general law or proposing a
255 constitutional amendment regarding _____?
256 Yes ___ No ___
257 Which change do you prefer?
258 ____ (A) The change proposed by the initiative process
259 which _________.
260 ____ (B) The change offered as an alternative proposal
261 which _______.
262 Part IV. If an initiative proposed by Part II or Part
263 III fails to be adopted or approved pursuant to the process
264 provided in this amendment, an identical initiative may not be
265 resubmitted sooner than two years following the failure of the
266 prior initiative.
267 Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment,
268 the Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
269 appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
270 paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
271 change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
272 for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
273 grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
274 internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
275 language; and translate effective dates.
276 Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
277 shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
278 Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
279 state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
280 number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
Page 10

number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
HB14 INTRODUCED
281 election ballot and shall set forth the following description
282 of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
283 constitutional amendment:
284 "Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
285 of 2022, providing that the people may initiate the enactment
286 of certain general laws or constitutional amendments and that
287 the Legislature may offer an alternative proposal.
288 Proposed by Act ________."
289 This description shall be followed by the following
290 language:
291 "Yes ( ) No ( )."
292 Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
293 a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
294 by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 11